Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Equines

257.472.
Kentucky Equine Health and Welfare Council — Duties — Members — Meetings — Construction of KRS 257.472 to 257.476.

The Kentucky Equine Health and Welfare Council is hereby established and shall be attached to the Kentucky Department of Agriculture for administrative purposes only. The council shall:

Assist, advise, and consult with the commission created by KRS

257.192

on equine health and welfare issues;

Act to maintain the health, welfare, and safety of equines in the Commonwealth; and

Carry out the duties assigned to the council in KRS

257.474

.

The council shall be composed of thirteen (13) voting members and two (2) nonvoting ex officio members as follows:

The Commissioner of Agriculture or his or her designee;

The state veterinarian or his or her designee;

One (1) representative of the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture Equine Initiative to be designated by the dean of the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture;

One (1) representative of the University of Louisville Equine Industry Program to be designated by the dean of the College of Business;

One (1) representative of equine education programs chosen by Morehead State University, Murray State University, or Western Kentucky University on a rotating basis at the pleasure of the university to serve a one (1) year term;

The executive director of the University of Kentucky Livestock Disease Diagnostic Center, or his or her designee, or the executive director of the Murray State University Breathitt Veterinary Center, or his or her designee, who shall serve one (1) year terms on a rotating basis;

One (1) representative of the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation with an interest in equine issues;

One (1) veterinarian representing the Kentucky Equine Health and Welfare Alliance Inc.;

One (1) member representing the Kentucky Veterinary Medical Association;

One (1) member to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees submitted by the Kentucky Horse Council;

One (1) member representing organized horse rescue entities to be selected by the Governor from a listing of those who apply for membership on the council;

Two (2) members at large who live in diverse regions of the state to be appointed by the Governor. Each member at large shall primarily represent one (1) of the following:

Equine breeders and owners; and

Agricultural interests;

The chair of the Senate Standing Committee on Agriculture, who shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member; and

The chair of the House Standing Committee on Agriculture and Small Business, who shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member.

Initial terms of members serving under subsection (2)(c), (d), and (g) to (l) of this section shall be staggered by the Governor. Thereafter, terms shall be for four (4) years or until their successors are duly appointed and qualified. Vacancies on the council shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

Consideration shall be given to racial and gender equity in the appointment of council members.

The council shall elect one (1) of its members to serve as chair for a term of two (2) years.

The council shall meet quarterly or upon the call of the chair. The first meeting of the council shall occur at the beginning of the quarter following appointments to the council.

A quorum of the council shall consist of seven (7) voting members. A majority of the voting members present may act upon matters before the council.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation.

Nothing in KRS

257.472

to

257.476

shall be construed to infringe upon the regulatory authority of:

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission to inspect, investigate, and supervise horses and other participants in horse racing and breeders incentive funds as provided by KRS Chapter 230, administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 230, or any other law applicable to the regulation of horse racing in the Commonwealth;

The Kentucky Board of Veterinary Examiners to license and certify veterinarians as provided by KRS Chapter 321, administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 321, or any other law applicable to the regulation of veterinarians in the Commonwealth; or

The Kentucky Livestock Care Standards Commission to make recommendations to the Board of Agriculture to establish, maintain, or revise standards governing the care and well-being of on-farm livestock and poultry, or any other authority of the commission authorized under this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 106, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). A reference to the “Kentucky Horse Racing Authority” in subsection (9) of this section, as created by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 106, sec. 1, has been changed in codification to the “Kentucky Horse Racing Commission” to reflect the reorganization of certain parts of the Executive Branch, as set forth in Executive Order 2009-535 and confirmed by the General Assembly in 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24. This change was made by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24, sec. 1938.

(7/15/2010). The proposed Senate Committee Substitute to House Bill 398, which became 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 106, attached the text of Senate Bill 105/HCS to HB 398 and made several changes to the existing provisions, including the addition of paragraph (c) to subsection (9) of this statute. As drafted, paragraph (c) contained the phrase, “commission authorized under this Act.” After examination of the materials in the bill folder and consultation with the drafter, “this Act” was changed to “this chapter” during codification, as all sections of 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 106 are located in KRS Chapter 257. This substitution was made by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(f).

257.474.
Duties and functions of council.

In addition to the duties relating to equine health and welfare matters set forth in KRS 257.472(1), the duties and functions of the council include but are not limited to:

Undertaking research, conducting public hearings, and collecting data to determine the prevalent equine health and welfare issues;

Striving to develop regional centers of care for unwanted, abused, neglected, or confiscated equines. The development of the centers may be undertaken in cooperation with state and local governments, private entities, universities, or other groups;

Creating a system of voluntary certification of equine rescue and retirement operations that includes, at a minimum, industry-accepted standards of care for equines;

Researching and offering suggestions to the commission for statutory changes affecting equine health, welfare, abuse, and neglect issues;

Assisting veterinarians and others in maintaining the health and welfare of equines by identifying and referring to the appropriate authorities critical areas of need; and

Submitting a written report annually to the Governor, the Department of Agriculture, and the Legislative Research Commission regarding its administrative, financial, and programmatic activities.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 106, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

257.476.
Equine health and welfare fund.

The equine health and welfare fund is created in the State Treasury as a trust and agency account to be administered by the council for the purposes provided in this section.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys accruing to this fund in any fiscal year, including state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, interest, and any other funds both public and private, shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.

Moneys received in the fund shall be used for carrying out the provisions of KRS

257.472

to

257.476

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 106, § 3, effective July 15, 2010.